Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1426.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124D.4531, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Career and technical revenue. (a) A district with a career and technical program approved under this section for the fiscal year in which the levy is certified is eligible for career and technical revenue equal to deleted text begin 35deleted text end new text begin 50new text end percent of approved expenditures in the fiscal year in which the levy is certified for the following: (1) salaries paid to essential, licensed personnel providing direct instructional services to students in that fiscal year, including extended contracts, for services rendered in the district's approved career and technical education programs, excluding salaries reimbursed by another school district under clause (2); (2) amounts paid to another Minnesota school district for salaries of essential, licensed personnel providing direct instructional services to students in that fiscal year for services rendered in the district's approved career and technical education programs; (3) contracted services provided by a public or private agency other than a Minnesota school district or cooperative center under chapter 123A or 136D; (4) necessary travel between instructional sites by licensed career and technical education personnel; (5) necessary travel by licensed career and technical education personnel for vocational student organization activities held within the state for instructional purposes; (6) curriculum development activities that are part of a five-year plan for improvement based on program assessment; (7) necessary travel by licensed career and technical education personnel for noncollegiate credit-bearing professional development; and (8) specialized vocational instructional supplies. (b) The district must recognize the full amount of this levy as revenue for the fiscal year in which it is certified. deleted text begin (c) The amount of the revenue calculated under this subdivision may not exceed $17,850,000 for taxes payable in 2012, $15,520,000 for taxes payable in 2013, and $20,657,000 for taxes payable in 2014. deleted text end deleted text begin (d) If the estimated revenue exceeds the amount in paragraph (c), the commissioner must reduce the percentage in paragraph (a) until the estimated revenue no longer exceeds the limit in paragraph (c). deleted text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for revenue for fiscal year 2026 and later. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124D.4531, subdivision 1a, is amended to read: Subd. 1a. Career and technical levy. deleted text begin (a) For fiscal year 2014 only, a district may levy an amount not more than the product of its career and technical revenue times the lesser of one or the ratio of its adjusted net tax capacity per adjusted pupil unit in the fiscal year in which the levy is certified to the career and technical revenue equalizing factor. The career and technical revenue equalizing factor for fiscal year 2014 equals $7,612. deleted text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (a)new text end For fiscal year deleted text begin 2015 and laterdeleted text end new text begin 2025new text end , a district may levy an amount not more than the product of its career and technical revenue times the lesser of one or the ratio of its adjusted net tax capacity per adjusted pupil unit in the fiscal year in which the levy is certified to the career and technical revenue equalizing factor. The career and technical revenue equalizing factor for fiscal year deleted text begin 2015 and laterdeleted text end new text begin 2025new text end equals $7,612. new text begin (b) For fiscal year 2026 and later, the commissioner of education must establish a tax rate for career and technical program revenue that raises $46,461,000 in each fiscal year. If the commissioner of education determines that the initial amount of a school district's career and technical program levy exceeds the district's career and technical program revenue, then the district's career and technical program levy must be reduced to equal the career and technical program revenue. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for revenue for fiscal year 2026 and later. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124D.4531, subdivision 1b, is amended to read: Subd. 1b. Career and technical aid. deleted text begin For fiscal year 2014 and later,deleted text end A district's career and technical aid equals its career and technical revenue less its career and technical levy. If the district levy is less than the permitted levy, the district's career and technical aid shall be reduced proportionately. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for revenue for fiscal year 2026 and later. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124D.4531, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Revenue guarantee. new text begin (a) new text end Notwithstanding subdivision 1, paragraph (a), the career and technical education revenue for a district is not less than the lesser of: (1) the district's career and technical education revenue for the previous fiscal year; or (2) 100 percent of the approved expenditures for career and technical programs included in subdivision 1, paragraph (a), for the fiscal year in which the levy is certified. new text begin (b) A district subject to the revenue guarantee in paragraph (a) must place its career and technical revenue in an account reserved for career and technical programming. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for revenue for fiscal year 2026 and later. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124D.4531, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. District reports. new text begin (a) new text end Each district or cooperative center must report data to the department for all career and technical education programs as required by the department to implement the career and technical revenue formula. new text begin (b) A district receiving career and technical revenue under the revenue guarantee in subdivision 3 must annually report its career and technical reserve account balance in total dollars, amount per pupil unit, and amount per student participating in career and technical programming for that year. A school district with a balance in its career and technical reserve account exceeding $200 per pupil unit must hold a public discussion of its career and technical programming at a regularly scheduled school board meeting by March 15 of the following fiscal year. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for revenue for fiscal year 2026 and later. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; CAREER AND TECHNICAL PROGRAM AID.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Career and technical program aid. new text end new text begin For career and technical program aid under Minnesota Statutes, section 124D.4531: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end Sec. 7. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124D.4531, subdivision 3a, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-02199 124D.4531 CAREER AND TECHNICAL REVENUE. Subd. 3a. Revenue adjustments. Notwithstanding subdivisions 1, 1a, and 3, for taxes payable in 2012 to 2014 only, the department must calculate the career and technical revenue for each district according to Minnesota Statutes 2010, section 124D.4531, and adjust the revenue for each district proportionately to meet the statewide revenue target under subdivision 1, paragraph (c). For purposes of calculating the revenue guarantee under subdivision 3, the career and technical education revenue for the previous fiscal year is the revenue according to Minnesota Statutes 2010, section 124D.4531, before adjustments to meet the statewide revenue target.